Tennessee statutes. Title 30 Administration of Estates
Part 2

Homestead

30-2-201. Assignment of homestead.

The homestead in lands of a decedent, inuring to the benefit of a surviving spouse or minor children, shall be assigned and set apart in the manner provided in this part.

Acts 1873, ch. 98, § 1; Shan., § 3808; Code 1932, § 7729; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 7729; Acts 1976, ch. 529, § 12; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-901.

Cross-References. Descent of homestead, § 31-1-104.

Homestead Act, title 7, ch. 66.

Homestead and personal property exemptions, Tenn. Const. art. XI, § 11.

Homestead exemption, title 26, chapter 2, part 3.

Jurisdiction of chancery courts of probate and related matters, title 16, chapter 16, part 2.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 432.

Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 652, 653.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 4-1102.

Law Reviews.

Davis v. Davis: The End of Interspousal Tort Immunity Tips the Scales on the Last Intrafamilial Immunity Stronghold, 14 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 270 (1984).

Domestic Relations — 1957 Tennessee Survey (William J. Harbison), 10 Vand. L. Rev. 1082 (1957).

Homestead in Tennessee (Mark J. Mayfield), 25 Tenn. L. Rev. 261 (1958).

Intestate Succession in Tennessee (Douglas P. Quay), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 63 (1978).

Non-Tax Aspects of Estate Planning (Ronald Lee Gilman), 2 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 41 (1972).

Tennessee Law and Equal Rights Amendment: Property Law, Employment Relations and Juries, 3 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 327 (1973).

The Tennessee Court System (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 189 (1978).

30-2-202. Jurisdiction.

The probate court, at any of its sessions, shall have jurisdiction concurrent with the circuit and chancery courts, of applications for laying off of homestead.

Code 1858, § 2407 (deriv. Acts 1849-1850, ch. 77, § 1); Shan., § 4150; mod. Code 1932, § 8367; Acts 1976, ch. 529, § 13; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-902.

Cross-References. Chancery courts' concurrent jurisdiction over partition and sales of estates, § 16-11-111.

Circuit court, partition and distribution, § 16-10-109.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 652.

Law Reviews.

Decedents' Estates, Trusts and Future Interests — 1960 Tennessee Survey (Herman L. Trautman), 13 Vand. L. Rev. 1101 (1960).

Non-Tax Aspects of Estate Planning (Ronald Lee Gilman), 2 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 41 (1972).

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281 (1978).

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241 (1978).

The Tennessee Court System — The County Court, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 419 (1978).

30-2-203. Notice of application.

When an application for homestead is filed pursuant to this part, it shall be served upon the personal representative, if one has been appointed, and to the heirs or devisees and distributees or legatees who reside in this state. If there is a minor interested, the guardian shall also be served, and, if no guardian has been appointed, the courts shall appoint a guardian ad litem for the minor. Service of the application upon the parties named pursuant to this subsection (a), shall constitute adequate notice of the application for homestead.

It shall not be necessary to serve the application for homestead upon nonresidents, but any nonresident interested in the estate and not so served shall have three (3) years from the date of the application to move for a rehearing of the cause. The filing of a petition for a rehearing and service of the petition on all interested parties shall constitute adequate notice of the rehearing. The cost of the rehearing shall be taxed as may be deemed just by the court.

Code 1858, §§ 2408 — 2410 (deriv. Acts 1849-1850, ch. 77, § 3-5); Shan., §§ 4151 — 4153; mod. Code 1932, §§ 8368 — 8370; impl. am. Acts 1976, ch. 529, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 30-903 — 30-905; Acts 2002, ch. 735, § 14.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 652, 1078.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 4-1101, 4-1103, 4-1110.

30-2-204. Application for homestead — Action to set aside property so designated.

The surviving spouse may make application to any one of the courts named in § 30-2-202 in the county where the husband or wife, as the case may be, last resided before death, for the appointment of two (2) freeholders or householders of the county, unconnected by affinity or consanguinity with those interested in the estate of the deceased, to allot and set apart the homestead to the applicant, in connection with the county surveyor, or the surveyor's deputy.

Any action to set aside the property designated in this section shall be brought within the time limits set by § 31-4-102.

Code 1858, § 2411 (deriv. Acts 1849-1850, ch. 77, § 2); Shan., § 4154; mod. Code 1932, § 8371; Acts 1976, ch. 529, § 14; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-906; Acts 1999, ch. 491, § 3.

Cross-References. Circuit court, partition and distribution, § 16-10-109.

Concurrent jurisdiction of chancery court over partition and sales of estates, § 16-11-111.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 121.

Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 652, 653.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 4-1102, 4-1103.

30-2-205. Appointment of substitute surveyor.

If the surveyor is connected with any of the parties interested, either by affinity or consanguinity, the court shall appoint some competent surveyor, other than the surveyor's deputy, in the surveyor's place.

Code 1858, § 2412 (deriv. Acts 1849-1850, ch. 77, § 2); Shan., § 4155; mod. Code 1932, § 8372; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-907.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 653.

30-2-206. Proceedings summary.

The proceedings upon applications for homestead are summary, unless the applicant is the personal representative, and shall be heard and determined at the first term after notice.

Code 1858, § 2413 (deriv. Acts 1784 (Apr.), ch. 22, § 10); Shan., § 4156; mod. Code 1932, § 8373; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-908.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 653.

30-2-207. Order delivered to surveyor — Commissioners notified to lay off homestead — Oath.

The clerk of the court shall, within forty (40) days after the adjournment of the court, deliver to the surveyor a copy of the order, and thereupon the surveyor shall notify the two (2) commissioners of the time and place, to be designated by the surveyor, of laying off the homestead; before entering upon that duty, the surveyor shall administer to the commissioners an oath for the faithful and true performance of that duty.

Code 1858, § 2415 (deriv. Acts 1849-1850, ch. 77, § 6; 1851-1852, ch. 95, § 1); Shan., § 4158; mod. Code 1932, § 8375; impl. am. Acts 1976, ch. 529, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-909.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 655.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 4-1103.

30-2-208. Out-of-county lands.

Should any of the lands to which the applicant may be entitled as homestead lie out of the county where the application is made, the commissioners, if so directed in the order of court, shall view and take them into estimate.

Code 1858, § 2415 (deriv. Acts 1849-1850, ch. 77, § 6; 1851-1852, ch. 95, § 1); Shan., § 4158; mod. Code 1932, § 8375; Acts 1976, ch. 529, § 15; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-910.

30-2-209. Assignment out of sale proceeds.

If real estate is so situated that homestead cannot be set apart, as provided in this part, then the realty shall be sold and five thousand dollars ($5,000) of the proceeds invested in real estate, under the direction of the court having jurisdiction to be held as homestead subject to the law governing homestead, or if the court deems it more desirable and practical, it may order the payment of five thousand dollars ($5,000) in cash or other personal property outright and in fee to the surviving spouse, if any, otherwise to the minor children, if any, in lieu of all other homestead rights in the realty of the deceased.

Acts 1873, ch. 98, § 1; Shan., §§ 3808, 4145; mod. Code 1932, §§ 7729, 8357; impl. am. Acts 1933, ch. 72, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 7729; Acts 1976, ch. 529, § 16; 1979, ch. 61, § 9; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-912; Acts 1985, ch. 140, § 11.

Cross-References. Extent and limitation of exemption, § 26-2-306.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 496.

Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 654, 1078.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 4-1102, 4-1110.

Law Reviews.

Non-Tax Aspects of Estate Planning (Ronald Lee Gilman), 2 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 41 (1972).

Rights of Creditors in Insurance — The Tennessee Exemption Statutes (Paul J. Hartman), 5 Vand. L. Rev. 760 (1952).

Tennessee Law and Equal Rights Amendment: Property Law, Employment Relations and Juries, 3 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 327 (1973).

30-2-210. Assignment of homestead and plat recorded.

The commissioners shall, in their report, exhibit a plat of the homestead, and also plainly set forth the same by metes and bounds where the homestead can be so assigned, and if the report is confirmed by the court, the clerk shall enter it in full with the plat on the records of the court.

Code 1858, § 2417 (deriv. Acts 1849-1850, ch. 77, § 7); Shan., § 4160; Code 1932, § 8377; Acts 1976, ch. 529, § 17; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-913.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 655, 656.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 4-1104.

30-2-211. Costs.

The costs of the application shall be paid by the applicant unless the court otherwise adjudge.

Code 1858, § 2418 (deriv. Acts 1815, ch. 85, § 3); Shan., § 4161; mod. Code 1932, § 8378; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-914.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 652, 656.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 4-1105.